en: British sea products
de: Britische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar británicos
fr: Produits de la mer britanniques
hr: Britanski morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici britannici

en: Czech sea products
cs: České mořské produkty
de: Tschechische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar checos
fr: Produits de la mer tchèques
hr: Češki proizvodi od mora

en: German sea products
de: Deutsche Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar alemanes
fr: Produits de la mer allemands
hr: Njemački morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici tedeschi

en: Hungarian sea products
de: Ungarische Meeresprodukte
es: Productos del mar húngaros
fr: Produits de la mer hongrois
hr: Mađarski morski proizvodi
it: Prodotti ittici ungheresi

en: Italian sea products
fr: Produits de la mer italiens

en: Fatty fishes, blue fishes, fatty fish, blue fish, fat fishes, fat fish
fr: Poissons gras, poissons bleus, poisson gras, poisson bleu
hr: Masne ribe
nl: Vette vissen, Vette vis
pl: Tłuste ryby
zh: 高脂鱼类

en: Lean fishes, white fishes, lean fish, white fish
fr: Poissons maigres, poissons blancs, poisson maigre, poisson blanc

en: Tilapia
de: Tilapia
fr: Tilapia
hr: Tilapija
ja: ティラピア, テラピア

en: Lump fish
fr: Lompe

en: Sturgeon
fr: Esturgeon
hr: Jesetra
ja: チョウザメ

en: European whitefish
fr: Corégone lavaret, Lavaret

en: Spiny scorpionfish
fr: Rascasse

en: Steamed spiny scorpionfish
fr: Rascasse cuite à la vapeur

en: Cooked ling
fr: Julienne cuite, Lingue cuite

en: ling
fr: Julienne, Lingue

en: Blue ling
fr: Lingue bleue

en: Blue ling fillets, Blue ling fillet
fr: Filets de lingue bleue, Filet de lingue bleue

en: Common dentex
fr: Denté
hr: Obični zubatac
nl: Tandbrasem

en: John Dory
fr: Saint-Pierre

en: Golden redfish
fr: Sébaste, Grand sébaste, Daurade sébaste, Sébaste du nord